lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX R N 82
SFX R 0       s               ti
SFX R ti      davausi         ti
SFX R ti      davaisi         ti
SFX R ti      davosi          ti
SFX R ti      davomës         ti
SFX R ti      davotës         ti
SFX R ti      siuosi          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX R ti      iuosi           [sð]ti
SFX R zti     siuosi          zti
SFX R þti     ðiuosi          þti
SFX R ti      siesi           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX R ti      iesi            [sð]ti
SFX R zti     siesi           zti
SFX R þti     ðiesi           þti
SFX R ti      sis             [^sðzþ]ti
SFX R ti      is              [sð]ti
SFX R zti     sis             zti
SFX R þti     ðis             þti
SFX R ti      simës           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX R ti      imës            [sð]ti
SFX R zti     simës           zti
SFX R þti     ðimës           þti
SFX R ti      sitës           [^sðzþ]ti
SFX R ti      itës            [sð]ti
SFX R zti     sitës           zti
SFX R þti     ðitës           þti
SFX R ti      èiausi          ti
SFX R i       umeisi          ti
SFX R i       umeis           ti
SFX R i       øsi             ti
SFX R i       umëmës          ti
SFX R i       umës            ti
SFX R i       umëtës          ti
SFX R i       utës            ti
SFX R ti      kis             [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      is              kti
SFX R gti     kis             gti
SFX R ti      kimës           [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      imës            kti
SFX R gti     kimës           gti
SFX R ti      kitës           [^kg]ti
SFX R ti      itës            kti
SFX R gti     kitës           gti
SFX R ti      damasis         ti
SFX R ti      damasi          ti
SFX R ti      damiesi         ti
SFX R ti      damosi          ti
SFX R i       asi             ti
SFX R ti      davusis         ti
SFX R 0       si              [ao]
SFX R a       uosi            a
SFX R o       ausi            o
SFX R a       iesi            [^i]a
SFX R a       esi             [^èþ]ia
SFX R èia     tiesi           èia
SFX R a       esi             [^d]þia
SFX R þia     iesi            dþia
SFX R o       aisi            o
SFX R 0       mës             [ao]
SFX R 0       tës             [ao]
SFX R 0       ntis            a
SFX R o       antis           o
SFX R 0       masi            [ao]
SFX R 0       si              ë
SFX R ë       iausi           [^dt]ë
SFX R ë       þiausi          dë
SFX R të      èiausi          të
SFX R ë       eisi            ë
SFX R 0       mës             ë
SFX R 0       tës             ë
SFX R ë       usis            ë
SFX R ë       æsis            ë
SFX R ë       æsi             ë
SFX R ë       usiosi          ë
SFX R ë       imasis          ë
SFX R ë       imosi           ë
SFX R ë       imuisi          ë
SFX R ë       imàsi           ë
SFX R ë       imusi           ë
SFX R ë       imesi           ë
SFX R ë       imaisi          ë
SFX R ë       imøsi           ë
