lib/dict/lt.dic
absorbuoja/ENRSXvw
administruoja/R
agurkauja/ENRXdjv
aikğtyti/R
aistrinti/NRSTXacko
ğaknija/ENRSXo
aktyvuoti/RSTX
şaliaukuoti/R
şalèiuoja/ERSX
alsinti/NRTXaefjlm
angliuoti/NRTXdkpw
anotuoti/NRSTX
apeliuoti/R
şargo/ENRX
arpuoja/ENRXdp
asimiliuoti/RSTX
audşia/ENRXabcdefhijklmpquvw
auğinti/NRSTXabdfhilpu
aukğtina/ENRSXdefhjkprv
ausuoti/NRTXa
şavëti/NRSTXaklw
badëja/ENRXdehlx
baiginëti/RSTXdefjkl
baisëja/ENRSXfr
baldë/NOPRSXYdpqsvx
balotiruoti/RSTX
barikaduoti/NRTXlx
baudşia/ENRXcefjklo
baugğtinti/NRSTXcdop
beldë/NPRSXdfjklnopqrsvwx
beria/ENRSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
bûgğtauja/ENRX
bildina/ENRXdefgkl
bjauroja/ENRSXadejkpw
blandyti/NRSTWXpqu
blizginti/NRTXdefpqr
blusinëjo/R
boksuoja/ERSX
braido/ENRSXabdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
branginti/NRSTXf
brauna/ENRSXcnopstuvwx
brûşina/ENRXadefkmqr
broliauti/NRSTXfw
brukti/NRSTXcdefjklopqruvwx
budinti/NRTXdefijkp
busti/NRTXbdefikn
centruoja/ENRSXdk
ëda/ENRXacdefhijklmnoptvw
daigoti/NRTXdep
dairo/R
dangina/ENRSXbcdeghiklnpqstuwx
darbina/ENRSXco
darko/ENRSXdekpqw
dauşti/NRSTXcdefhiklpqrwx
degë/NPRXacdefhijklopvx
degutuoti/NRTXdkpw
deklasuoti/RSTX
demineralizuoja/ENR
dengë/NPRSXabdefghijklmnqrtuvwx
derina/ENRSXdefhjkopqrtuvw
dezorientuoja/ERSX
dşiauti/NRSTXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
dieginëti/RSTXcjsw
diferencijuoti/RSTXd
dingoti/NRTXo
dislokuoja/ERSX
dûkti/NRTXacdefhjklov
dëmëti/R
drabstyti/NRSTWXadefjklmprtvwx
drasko/ENRSXacdefijkmopqrtuvw
drebia/ENRSXacdefjklmnoqrv
dribina/ERSX
droşinëja/ENRXdjkw
drûtina/ENRXfr
dëstinëti/NRTXkw
dulkina/ENRSXacdefjklmpqrtvw
dumğlëti/RSTX
duobëti/NRTXdp
dvejinti/NRSTXkw
eikvoja/ENRSXdhkptw
eiti/NRSTXabcdefghijklmnoqrvwx
elgë/R
ğelpia/ENRXjkw
şemëti/NRTXdfkpw
şergia/ENRSXadlmp
erzina/ENRSXcdfjklorvw
fanatizuoja/ENRSXk
filmuoja/ENRSXdefhjnqv
fotografuoja/ERSXdefhijqruv
gadinti/NRSTXadefjkmprw
gailinti/NRTXo
gaivëja/ERSX
galynëti/NRSTXr
galvoti/R
garankğtëja/ERSX
gardina/ENRXfr
garsinti/NRSTXacdefmopr
gaudë/NOPRSXYadefjkprvw
gauşti/RSTX
gelbëti/NRSTXdfp
gentina/ERSX
gerti/NRSTXacdefhijklnoqrtuvwx
giedrinti/NRSTXdpqu
giminiuoti/NRSTXw
ginkluoja/ENRSXaehmq
gydyti/NRSTWXabdefjklmpqrx
gyvena/ENRSXabdefhijklmnoquvwx
glamşyti/NRTWXafkmw
glaudinti/NRTXkw
glëbesèiuoti/RSTX
glemşia/ENRSXaefjkvw
glitena/ERSX
glosto/ENRSXadefhijklmnpruvwx
gnaibo/ENRXadefjkl
gnybia/ENRXbdefhjklnqrx
godëja/ENRSXnr
grabinëja/ENRSXfk
grandyti/NRTWXadefjkq
graudinti/NRSTXckow
grûdinti/NRSTXfltvx
gretina/ENRSXkv
griauti/NRSTXacdefgklouvwx
grimuoja/ENRSXe
griovë/NPRSXacdefgklouvwx
grûmë/NPRSXdkorw
grobti/R
gráşta/ENRSXbgkmnq
grupuoja/ENRSXdfhjkptvw
gudina/ENRXc
guldyti/NRTWXcdefgjkorvw
gundyti/NRTWXcfjkrw
gvieğia/ENRSXr
èiauğkë/NPRSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
ğiauğëti/NRSTX
şiebia/ENRXceklx
ğienauja/ENRXefjkvw
ğildyti/NRSTWXabcefhjklmnrtvwx
implantuoja/R
indeksuoti/R
şino/ENPRSXbdfjkmnrvw
internacionalizuoja/R
investuoti/R
şiûrinëja/ENRSXacdefhjkoq
irstyti/NRTWXfr
ğiukğlina/ENRXjv
èiulpsto/ERSX
èiupti/NRTXefjklqrw
izoliuoti/NRSTX
yrinëti/RSTX
jaukti/NRTXkw
jodinëti/NRTXdfiklr
judinti/NRSTXcdfiklopruw
juodina/ENRXacdeklpw
ûkë/NPRSXk
kabinëja/ENRSXabdehjklmnpqvwx
kaiğyti/NRTWXadefjklmpr
kaitina/ENRSXcdefhijklprv
kalë/NPRSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
kalstyti/NRTWXk
kamuoja/ENRSXcdefjlopqrvx
kandşioti/NRTXdeijkl
kapoja/ENRSXabcdefijklruvwx
karğë/NPRXcdehjklpvw
karğèiuoti/NRSTXfkor
kartoja/ENRSXbfnr
kasyti/NRSTWXadefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
kauna/ENRSXerw
ğûkauti/NRTXfijrvw
kebernoja/ERSX
keisti/NRSTXabcdfhiklmnprtuvw
keliauti/R
kemeruoti/NRTX
kepti/NRSTXacdefhijklpruvx
keroja/ENRXdjklop
ketinti/NRTXflx
kietina/ENRXefklx
kinko/ENRXcdefjkloprw
kiğti/NRSTXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
kûlë/NPRSXadefijklmpqruvwx
klajoti/R
klaupti/NRSTXjklnx
klebina/ENRXdfkp
kliaukia/ENRXdjlv
kliovë/NPRSXfr
klykina/ENRX
klonuoti/RSTXfhjrv
knaisioja/ENRXadefkr
knerpë/NPRXflox
kniaupti/RSTX
knisti/NRSTXadefiklmoru
kompiliuoja/ENRSXchkotw
kompromituoja/ENRXkw
konfûzija/ERSX
konsultuoja/ENRSXfr
konvertuoti/RSTXhkntvw
kopijuoti/NRSTXehkqtv
kûrë/NPRSXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
kramèioti/NRTX
krapğtinëti/NRSTX
kraustinëja/ENRXkw
kreipia/ENRSXbdefhnprtw
krekia/R
krikdyti/NRTWXdfk
kristalizuoti/NRSTXp
krûmyti/NRSTWXdp
kruğti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
kësnoja/ERSX
këtoja/ENRXdlp
kukèioti/NRTXfkr
kumğèiuoti/NRSTXamw
kuopoja/ERSX
kupstuoja/ENRSX
kurti/NRSTXbcdefghijklnortuvwx
kvailinti/NRTXadkmp
kvatoti/NRSTXlqvx
kverkğti/RSTX
kvëpina/ENRXdfjv
laido/ENRSXjklwx
laşinti/NRSTXw
ğlaistë/NPRSXY
ğlakstyti/NRTWXafkmr
lamina/ERSX
lankuoja/ENRXkw
lasyti/NRTWXdjkw
lauşo/ENRSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
lavina/ENRSXdfipru
ğlekia/ENRXak
lepina/R
ğliauşë/R
ğlieja/ENRSXbjknvw
lietë/NPRSXfjklrvw
linksminti/NRSTXcfijnorvx
lipti/NRSTXabcdefghjkloqrwx
liuobë/NPRXadefjklmrw
lygina/ENRSXabdefhjklnprvwx
lypëja/R
loğia/ENRSXabdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
ğëlsta/ENRXcfijopv
luoğinti/NRSTXakw
mëşë/NPRXacdefjlmq
maşina/ENRXadefjkpqrw
maivo/R
mala/ENRSXcdfhijkopruvw
maloninti/NRSTXfr
manyti/NRTWXcdefhijklmopqtuvx
marksto/ERSX
masto/ENRXdekw
matuoja/ENRSXabdfhjknprv
maukğlinti/NRTXalmx
mazgo/ENRXbdjkl
megzdinti/NRTX
melşë/NPRXdfj
mena/ENRXbcfijklnoqvx
meta/ENRSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
mëgdşioti/NRTXf
miegoti/R
miltuoti/NRTXdkpw
mindo/ENRXadefjklpq
mëèioti/NRSTXdjkw
mitina/ENRXcdei
myluoja/ENRSXflr
mëlyniuoti/NRTXkw
mokslinti/NRTXdp
mûrija/ENRXadfjklrw
muğa/ENRSXabcdefghijklmnopqruvwx
muistyti/NRSTWXfkrw
murina/ENRX
nagrinëja/ENRSXdefhpr
ğnairuoja/ENRXfkw
narplioja/ENRXbdjklpw
neğioja/ENRSXacdefhijklmnpqruvwx
nepatogina/R
nerti/NRSTXcdefhijklpqrwx
niaukstyti/NRSTWXr
niûkë/NPRXdfklp
niugina/ENRX
ğniurkğti/NRSTXek
ğnopğti/RSTX
nuoginti/NRSTXaem
oşiuoti/NRSTXx
oşkuoti/RSTX
orientuoti/NRSTXhtvw
painioja/ENRSXbcdfjklnoprvwx
pakuoja/ENRSXcdhkoptw
parğiuoti/NRSTXm
peikëja/ENRSXn
pelnyti/NRSTWXelqrx
peria/ENRSXcdefklpqr
piemenuoti/NRTX
piktina/ENRSXfr
pina/ENRSXacdefhjklopqrtvw
pirkti/NRSTXabcdefhijklmnpqrvwx
pjausto/ENRSXacdefjklmoqrvw
plaiksto/ENRSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
plaukioja/ENRSXadfijknqruv
pleğia/ERSXabcdehijklmnopqtuvwx
plëğia/ENRSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvx
pliekti/NRTXcdefjklrwx
pliuğkenti/NRTX
pliurpë/NPRXdfijkopuvx
plûkti/NRTXdefjklpqrvx
plûsta/ENRSXabdfhijklmprtvw
plunkë/NPRXe
ponuoti/NRTXk
prağydina/ERSX
prausia/ENRSXabdemnpq
programuoja/ENRSXfhjklnrvwx
pûsti/NRSTXabcdefghijklnpqrsuv
puikauti/NRTX
punta/ENRSXabcdefhjklo
purtë/NOPRSXYadefjkqrvw
putoja/R
rabşdina/ERSX
raièioja/ENRSXk
raito/ENRSXbdfklnprwx
raizgo/ENRXabdejklpw
rağkyti/NRTWXdefjkqrw
ramsèioti/NRTX
randuoja/ENRX
rasti/NRSTXbdiknpsw
raugti/NRSTXafjklmvx
rauna/ENRSXabcdefhijklnopqrstuvwx
redaguoja/ENRSXbfhijknqrtvw
reguliuoti/NRSTXdefhkqrw
reikti/NRTXjov
remia/ENRSXabcfjklnorwx
rengti/NRSTXacdefhjkmopqrtvw
replikuoti/NRSTX
rezervuoti/NRSTX
rida/ERSX
riekë/NPRXbehin
rikdo/ENRXikw
rioglina/ENRSXbcdefijklnopswx
ritinëti/RSTX
ryşta/ENRSXr
rëkia/ENRXadefhiklpx
rëmina/ENRXco
ropğtë/NPRSXnopqsvx
rungë/NPRSXertw
ruzgina/ENRX
sapnuoja/ENRSXdfjkmrv
sëdëti/R
sendinti/NRTXfkqr
sieti/NRSTXbfjknw
siulpsto/ENRX
skaidrija/R
skalbë/NPRSXabdefhijklmnopqrtuvx
skambëti/R
skarmaliuoti/RSTX
skersti/NRSTXdfjprv
skëèioti/RSTX
skliaudë/NPRSXYabkmnw
skriaudë/NPRXe
skusta/ERSX
slëgëti/NRSTXw
smaugë/NPRSXYcefhjkloqrtvwx
smëliuoti/NRTXkw
snukiuoti/NRTX
spaudyti/NRSTWXfkpv
spietë/NPRSXkvw
spjauti/NRTXadjlmq
sûpuoja/ENRX
staipo/R
steigia/ENRSXbcjov
stiprina/ENRSXcfkor
stumdo/ENRSXadefhijkmpqruw
sukioti/NRSTXdefhijklrvw
supa/ENRSXacdfjklmoprvw
sveria/ENRSXabefhjknrtw
taikstyti/NRSTWXw
talpina/ENRSXfkrw
tarpuoja/ENRSX
teigia/ENRXceo
tekiuoti/RSTX
tenkinti/NRSTXfjr
terlioti/NRSTXadefjklmprvw
tiesina/ENRXbdfp
tinkina/ENRX
tëkğti/NRSTXadefjklmqvwx
trankyti/NRSTWXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
triauğkia/ENRSXk
trypia/ENRXdefjklvx
tuokia/ENRSXdekpw
tvanija/ENRXjv
tveria/ENRSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtwx
tvoti/NRSTXejkl
uosto/ENRXadfjkmvw
vadovauti/NRSTXfk
vaiğinti/NRSTXbdefhjkrtv
vaipyti/NRSTWXmnpqrvw
vaşiuoti/R
şvalgo/ENRSXadmrw
vanoja/ENRSXdejlpq
varinëti/NRTXdefkl
varto/ENRSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
veşa/ENRSXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
ğveisti/NRSTXadefhjklpqrv
ventiliuoja/ENRSXdhijoprstuv
verti/ENRSTXbcdeghijklnopqtuvwx
ğviesuoti/NRTX
vilia/ENRSXaemq
virina/ENRXbdefhjklnw
vynioti/NRSTXabcdehjklmnopqrtvwx
vokë/NPRSXaekmqw
